Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2507
Act; applicability.

The Plastic Container Coding Act shall apply to plastic bottles and rigid plastic containers manufactured or distributed on or after January 1, 1994.

Laws 1993, LB 63, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 83.